src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software ; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     South Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ================================
!! # Nominal inflection sublexica
! ================================

!! ## Inflection for odd-syllable nouns


LEXICON N_ODD
!! The default inflectional lexicon for odd-syllable nouns is **@LEXNAME@**.
!! Words like `gierehtse` is inflected using this lexicon. Other words inflected
!! like this are: `iehkede` (*evening*), guehpere (*nail*), tjaeleme (*writing*).
!! Many words in this class will have vowel changes in the second syllable,
!! between a reduced vowel in odd-syllable forms and a full vowel or diphthong
!! in even-syllable forms, as displayed in the paradigm below. This alternation
!! is regulated by two-level rules, but the rules require that the full
!! vowel is spelled out in the lexical entry as follows:
!! ```
!! gierehtse+N+Sem/Veh:gieriehts N_ODD "pulk" ; ! gieriehtsisnie
!! ```
!! That is, in the stem of the entry it says `-rieht-`, where `ie` is the
!! diphthong that is realised in even-syllable word forms. Another example
!! word is `darjome`:
!! ```
!! darjome+N+Sem/Feat:darjoem N_ODD ;
!! ```
!! with `-oe-` as the stem vowel to get a vowel change `o` => `oe` in even-syllable
!! word forms.
!
               +Sg:             N_ODD_SG       ;
               +Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                                N_ODD_ESS      ;
        +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP    R              ;
        +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
        +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gierehtse (*"pulk"*) # Paradigm for odd-syllable nouns
!!€ gierehtse:           gierehtse+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gierehtsen:          gierehtse+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ gierehtsem:          gierehtse+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ gieriehtsasse:       gierehtse+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ gieriehtsisnie:      gierehtse+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ gieriehtsistie:      gierehtse+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Sg+Com
!!€ gierehtsh:           gierehtse+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ gieriehtsidie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ gierehtsi:           gierehtse+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ gieriehtsidie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ gieriehtsijstie:     gierehtse+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ gierehtsigujmie:     gierehtse+N+Pl+Com
!!€ gieriehtsinie:       gierehtse+N+Ess


LEXICON N_ODD_MEETERE
!! * Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon @LEXNAME@
+Sg:eter N_ODD_SG_Px ;
          +Sg+Nom:etere         FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Acc:etere%>m      FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Gen:etere%>n      FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Ill:eter%>asse    FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
          +Sg+Ine:eter%>isnie   FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Ela:eter%>istie   FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:eter%>esne   FINAL1    ; 
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:eter%>este   FINAL1    ; 
          +Sg+Com:eter%>inie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Nom:eter%>h       FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Acc:eter%>idie    FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:eter%>idie    FINAL1    ; !Miesie Mavve
          +Pl+Gen:eter%>i       FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:eter%>ij      FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ill:eter%>idie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ine:eter%>inie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ela:eter%>ijstie  FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Com:eter%>igujmie FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:eter%>igyjmie FINAL1    ;
                 :eter          N_ODD_ESS ;
       +Cmp/SgNom:ter         R         ;
       +Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom:etere         R         ;
       +Cmp/SgGen:etere%>n      R         ;
       +Cmp/PlGen:eter%>i       R         ;


LEXICON IHTELE
!! * Odd-syll loanwords on -ihtele, such as kapihtele: lexicon @LEXNAME@
         :ihtel N_ODD_LOAN ;
+Err/Orth:ittel N_ODD_LOAN ;
!+Err/Orth:ïhtel N_ODD_LOAN ;
+Err/Orth:itel  N_ODD_LOAN ;
         :ittel R          ;

LEXICON N_ODD_LOAN
!! * Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon @LEXNAME@
+Sg: N_ODD_SG_Px ;
          +Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Ill:%>asse    FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
          +Sg+Ine:%>isnie   FINAL1    ;
          +Sg+Ela:%>istie   FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:%>esne   FINAL1    ; 
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:%>este   FINAL1    ; 
          +Sg+Com:%>inie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Acc:%>idie    FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>idie    FINAL1    ; !Miesie Mavve
          +Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ij      FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ill:%>idie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ine:%>inie    FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie  FINAL1    ;
          +Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1    ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie FINAL1    ;
                            N_ODD_ESS ;
       +Cmp/SgNom:e         R         ;
       +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n      R         ;
       +Cmp/PlGen:%>i       R         ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG
N_ODD_SG_Px ;
!!     - Odd-syll sg: lexicon @LEXNAME@
!          +Nom:e               FINAL1 ; ! sjekk
           +Nom:e%^DISIMP       FINAL1 ;
           +Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm    FINAL1 ;
           +Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn    FINAL1 ;
           +Ill:%>asse          FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ine+Err/Orth:%>isne         FINAL1 ;
           +Ine:%>isnie         FINAL1 ;
           +Ela:%>istie         FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+Err/Orth:%>iste         FINAL1 ;
  +Ine+Err/Orth:%>esne         FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+Err/Orth:%>este         FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPistie FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
           +Com:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com+Err/Orth:%>ine          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL
!!     - Odd-syll pl: lexicon @LEXNAME@
          +Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
          +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPidie    FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
 +Acc+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPide     FINAL1 ;
          +Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPij      FINAL1 ;
          +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +Ill+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPide     FINAL1 ;
          +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
          +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
          +Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_ESS
!!     - Odd-syll loanwords: lexicon @LEXNAME@
          +Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>ine FINAL1 ;
