src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin ! Dette er lemma som kan få flere possesive suffikser enn andre lemma.
nasjonaalisteåvtehke+v2+N+Sem/Hum+Use/NotDNorm:nasjovnaliste#åvtehk N_ODD ;
LEXICON NounNoPx
aarkebiejjhjielede+v2+N+Use/NotDNorm+Sem/Dummytag:aarke#biejjien#jielied N_ODD ;
aktenkrirriensysteeme+v1+N+Sem/Semcon+Use/DNorm:akten#krirrien#systeem N_ODD ;
aktore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:aktor N_ODD_LOAN ;
anglosaksere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:anglosakser N_ODD_LOAN ;
avtesåeleme+N+Sem/Dummytag:avte#såelem N_ODD ;
baerehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:baeriehk N_ODD ;
baersieldimmienummere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:baersieldimmie#nummer N_ODD_LOAN ;
beeljese+N+Sem/Clth:beeljes N_ODD ;
buerkehtse+N+Sem/Act:buerkehts N_ODD ;
daevere+N+Sem/Obj:daevier N_ODD ;
desembere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:desember N_ODD_LOAN ;
desimeetere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:desime N_ODD_MEETERE ;
dyngkeme+N+Sem/Dummytag:dyngkem N_ODD ;
egyptere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:egypter N_ODD_LOAN ;
eksaamene+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Event:eksamen N_ODD_LOAN ;
eksemplume+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:exemplum N_ODD_LOAN ;
ektiejuhteministere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ektiejuhte#minister N_ODD_LOAN ;
fïerpese+N+Sem/Dummytag:fïerpes N_ODD ;
finansministere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:finans#minister N_ODD_LOAN ;
gaetskehke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gaetskiehk N_ODD ;
gïelekapihtele+N+Sem/Dummytag:gïele#kap IHTELE ;
goeksegh+N+Sem/Wthr+Pl+CmpN/PlG:goekseg N_ODD_PL ;
goepehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:goepehk N_ODD ;
grævlinge+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Ani:grævling N_ODD_LOAN ;
hamstere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hamster N_ODD_LOAN ;
healsoekapihtele+N+Sem/Dummytag:healsoe#kap IHTELE ;
heevehtsgaatene+N+Sem/Dummytag:heevehts#gaaten N_ODD ;
hummere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hummer N_ODD_LOAN ;
jïevkehthdomtese+N+Sem/Dummytag:jïevkehth#domtes N_ODD ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Servodatdieđa:Tras-termer_41
kaasuse+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kasus N_ODD_LOAN ;
kalendere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kalender N_ODD_LOAN ;
kapihtele+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Txt:kap IHTELE ;
ketsjupe+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Food:ketchup N_ODD_LOAN ;
kilomeetere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Measr:kilome N_ODD_MEETERE ;
konferaansetjïehtjele+N+Sem/Plc:konferaanse#tjïehtjel N_ODD ; !https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Servodatdieđa:konferaansetjïehtjele
kredijtore+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:kreditor N_ODD_LOAN ;
lejjone+N+OLang/SWE+Sem/Dummytag:lejjon N_ODD_LOAN ;
lihtiedarjoje+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Hum:lihtie#darjoej N_ODD ;
maurere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:maurer N_ODD_LOAN ;
meetere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Measr:me N_ODD_MEETERE ;
mekanihkere+N+Sem/Hum:mekanihker N_ODD ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Luonddudieđa_ja_matematihkka:mekanihkkár
nentjeme+N+Sem/Dummytag:nentjiem N_ODD ;
nevrotihkere+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:nevrotiker N_ODD_LOAN ;
novembere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:november N_ODD_LOAN ;
ovdæjpele+N+Sem/Dummytag:ov#dæjpal N_ODD ;
parkomeetere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:parkome N_ODD_MEETERE ;
perfektume+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:perfektum N_ODD_LOAN ;
preesense+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:presens N_ODD_LOAN ;
provisovre+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:provisor N_ODD_LOAN ;
raateveesmeme+N+Sem/Dummytag:raate#veesmem N_ODD ;
regionalministere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:regional#minister N_ODD_LOAN ;
saadkeme+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:saadkem N_ODD ;
sakseere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sakseer N_ODD_LOAN ;
sermehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:sermehk N_ODD ; !elg, avled. av sermie
servere+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:server N_ODD_LOAN ;
skeptikere+N+Sem/Hum:skeptiker N_ODD_LOAN ;
skuvlekåarpese+N+Sem/Dummytag:skuvle#kåarpes N_ODD ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Education:skolekorps
staatuse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/State:staatus N_ODD_LOAN ; !XXX
stryjhkedïrrege+N+Sem/Dummytag:stryjhke#dïrreg N_ODD ;
telefonterrore+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:telefon#terror N_ODD_LOAN ;
tennise+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:tennis N_ODD_LOAN ;
termomeetere+N+Sem/Dummytag:termome N_ODD_MEETERE ;
parameetere+N+Sem/Dummytag:parame N_ODD_MEETERE ;
nulle% parameetere+N+MWE+Sem/Dummytag:nulle% parame N_ODD_MEETERE ;
tihtele+N+Sem/Txt:t IHTELE ;
tjagkere+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjagkar N_ODD ;
tjijlomeetere+N+Sem/Dummytag:tjijlo#me N_ODD_MEETERE ;
tjuntsehke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjuntsehk N_ODD ;
væptehke+N+Sem/Dummytag:væptehk N_ODD ;
vijkinge+N+Sem/Hum:vijking N_ODD_LOAN ;
jïjtjereeremeöörnege+N+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:jïjtjereereme#åårdneg N_ODD ;
skuvlesoejkesje+N+Sem/Dummytag:skuvle#soejkesj N_ODD ;
organisasjovnenommere+N+Sem/Dummytag:organisasjovne#nommer N_ODD ;
aksjovnedotkeme+N+Sem/Act:aksjovne#dotkem N_ODD ;
